Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1990.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1732-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended to read:Section 1732-A. Expiration.This subarticle shall expire December 31, [2025] 2029.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1990PN2509 - 2 - 12345678